South Dakota, session 2026, SB51.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 3-12C-213 be AMENDED:
3-12C-213. Any individual aggrieved by an order of the executive director issued
pursuant to this chapter and chapters 3-13 and 3-13A may, in writing, request a contested
case hearing before the executive director, if that individual believes that the order is
based upon a mistake of fact or error of law.
The written hearing request must be received by the executive director within sixty
days from the date the order was mailed to the individual by certified mail and must
contain a statement indicating the portion of the order being contested and the mistake
of fact or error of law that the individual believes resulted in an invalid order. If a written
request for hearing is not received by the executive director within sixty days from the
date the order was mailed by certified mail to the individual, then no court has jurisdiction
over a suit to contest the order.
For purposes of this section, if a written request for hearing is sent by United States
mail, the date of the postmark placed by the United States postal service is the date
received by the executive director.
A hearing under this section and any subsequent appeal must occur in accordance
with chapters 1-26 and 1-26D.

26.551.10 2 51
An Act to revise certain requirements for contesting actions of the South Dakota Retirement
System.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 51
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 51 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB51 ENROLLED